Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4220.01
Review of operation; report.

Following the close of
each calendar year, the board shall conduct a review of the operation of the
pool and report to the director the board's recommendations for cost savings
in the operation of the pool.

Laws 2009, LB358, § 2.